Utah statutes.
26-18-104.   Confidentiality of records.

(1)  Information obtained under this part shall be treated as confidential or controlled information under Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government Records Access and Management Act.

(2)  The board shall establish procedures insuring that the information described in Subsection 26-18-103(16) is held confidential by the pharmacist, being provided to the physician only upon request.

(3)  The board shall adopt and implement procedures designed to ensure the confidentiality of all information collected, stored, retrieved, assessed, or analyzed by the board, staff to the board, or contractors to the DUR program, that identifies individual physicians, pharmacists, or recipients.  The board may have access to identifying information for purposes of carrying out intervention activities, but that identifying information may not be released to anyone other than a member of the board.  The board may release cumulative nonidentifying information for research purposes.

